Illinois, session 104th, HB1765.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-8.5 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.5)7    Sec. 9-8.5. Limitations on campaign contributions.8    (a) It is unlawful for a political committee to accept 9contributions except as provided in this Section.10    (b) During an election cycle, a candidate political 11committee may not accept contributions with an aggregate value 12over the following: (i) $5,000 from any individual, (ii) 13$10,000 from any corporation, labor organization, or 14association, or (iii) $50,000 from a candidate political 15committee or political action committee. A candidate political 16committee may accept contributions in any amount from a 17political party committee. A candidate political committee 18established to elect a candidate to the General Assembly may 19accept contributions from only one legislative caucus 20committee. A candidate political committee may not accept 21contributions from a ballot initiative committee or from an 22independent expenditure committee.23    (b-5) Judicial elections.  HB1765- 2 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1        (1) In addition to any other provision of this 2    Section, a candidate political committee established to 3    support or oppose a candidate seeking nomination to the 4    Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court may not:5            (A) accept contributions from any entity that does 6        not disclose the identity of those who make 7        contributions to the entity, except for contributions 8        that are not required to be itemized by this Code; or9            (B) accept contributions from any out-of-state 10        person, as defined in this Article.11        (1.1) In addition to any other provision of this 12    Section, a political committee that is self-funding, as 13    described in subsection (h) of this Section, and is 14    established to support or oppose a candidate seeking 15    nomination, election, or retention to the Supreme Court, 16    the Appellate Court, or the Circuit Court may not accept 17    contributions from any single person, other than the 18    judicial candidate or the candidate's immediate family, in 19    a cumulative amount that exceeds $500,000 in any election 20    cycle. Any contribution in excess of the limits in this 21    paragraph (1.1) shall escheat to the State of Illinois. 22    Any political committee that receives such a contribution 23    shall immediately forward the amount that exceeds $500,000 24    to the State Treasurer who shall deposit the funds into 25    the State Treasury. 26        (1.2) In addition to any other provision of this   HB1765- 3 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1    Section, an independent expenditure committee established 2    to support or oppose a candidate seeking nomination, 3    election, or retention to the Supreme Court, the Appellate 4    Court, or the Circuit Court may not accept contributions 5    from any single person in a cumulative amount that exceeds 6    $500,000 in any election cycle. Any contribution in excess 7    of the limits in this paragraph (1.2) shall escheat to the 8    State of Illinois. Any independent expenditure committee 9    that receives such a contribution shall immediately 10    forward the amount that exceeds $500,000 to the State 11    Treasurer who shall deposit the funds into the State 12    Treasury. 13        (1.3) In addition to any other provision of this 14    Section, if a political committee established to support 15    or oppose a candidate seeking nomination, election, or 16    retention to the Supreme Court, the Appellate Court, or 17    the Circuit Court receives a contribution in excess of 18    $500 from: (i) any committee that is not required to 19    disclose its contributors under this Act; (ii) any 20    association that is not required to disclose its 21    contributors under this Act; or (iii) any other 22    organization or group of persons that is not required to 23    disclose its contributors under this Act, then that 24    contribution shall be considered an anonymous contribution 25    that shall escheat to the State, unless the political 26    committee reports to the State Board of Elections all   HB1765- 4 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1    persons who have contributed in excess of $500 during the 2    same election cycle to the committee, association, 3    organization, or group making the contribution. Any 4    political committee that receives such a contribution and 5    fails to report this information shall forward the 6    contribution amount immediately to the State Treasurer who 7    shall deposit the funds into the State Treasury. 8        (2) As used in this subsection, "contribution" has the 9    meaning provided in Section 9-1.4 and also includes the 10    following that are subject to the limits of this Section:11            (A) expenditures made by any person in concert or 12        cooperation with, or at the request or suggestion of, 13        a candidate, his or her designated committee, or their 14        agents; and15            (B) the financing by any person of the 16        dissemination, distribution, or republication, in 17        whole or in part, of any broadcast or any written, 18        graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared 19        by the candidate, his or her campaign committee, or 20        their designated agents.21        (3) As to contributions to a candidate political 22    committee established to support a candidate seeking 23    nomination to the Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or 24    Circuit Court:25            (A) No person shall make a contribution in the 26        name of another person or knowingly permit his or her   HB1765- 5 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1        name to be used to effect such a contribution.2            (B) No person shall knowingly accept a 3        contribution made by one person in the name of another 4        person.5            (C) No person shall knowingly accept reimbursement 6        from another person for a contribution made in his or 7        her own name.8            (D) No person shall make an anonymous 9        contribution.10            (E) No person shall knowingly accept any anonymous 11        contribution.12            (F) No person shall predicate (1) any benefit, 13        including, but not limited to, employment decisions, 14        including hiring, promotions, bonus compensation, and 15        transfers, or (2) any other gift, transfer, or 16        emolument upon:17                (i) the decision by the recipient of that 18            benefit to donate or not to donate to a candidate; 19            or20                (ii) the amount of any such donation.21        (4) No judicial candidate or political committee 22    established to support a candidate seeking nomination to 23    the Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court shall 24    knowingly accept any contribution or make any expenditure 25    in violation of the provisions of this Section. No officer 26    or employee of a political committee established to   HB1765- 6 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1    support a candidate seeking nomination to the Supreme 2    Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court shall knowingly 3    accept a contribution made for the benefit or use of a 4    candidate or knowingly make any expenditure in support of 5    or opposition to a candidate or for electioneering 6    communications in relation to a candidate in violation of 7    any limitation designated for contributions and 8    expenditures under this Section.9        (5) Where the provisions of this subsection (b-5) 10    conflict with any other provision of this Code, this 11    subsection (b-5) shall control. 12    (c) During an election cycle, a political party committee 13may not accept contributions with an aggregate value over the 14following: (i) $10,000 from any individual, (ii) $20,000 from 15any corporation, labor organization, or association, or (iii) 16$50,000 from a political action committee. A political party 17committee may accept contributions in any amount from another 18political party committee or a candidate political committee, 19except as provided in subsection (c-5). Nothing in this 20Section shall limit the amounts that may be transferred 21between a political party committee established under 22subsection (a) of Section 7-8 of this Code and an affiliated 23federal political committee established under the Federal 24Election Code by the same political party. A political party 25committee may not accept contributions from a ballot 26initiative committee or from an independent expenditure   HB1765- 7 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1committee. A political party committee established by a 2legislative caucus may not accept contributions from another 3political party committee established by a legislative caucus.4    (c-5) (Blank). 5    (c-10) (Blank). 6    (d) During an election cycle, a political action committee 7may not accept contributions with an aggregate value over the 8following: (i) $10,000 from any individual, (ii) $20,000 from 9any corporation, labor organization, political party 10committee, or association, or (iii) $50,000 from a political 11action committee or candidate political committee. A political 12action committee may not accept contributions from a ballot 13initiative committee or from an independent expenditure 14committee.15    (e) A ballot initiative committee may accept contributions 16in any amount from any source, provided that the committee 17files the document required by Section 9-3 of this Article and 18files the disclosure reports required by the provisions of 19this Article.20    (e-5) An independent expenditure committee may accept 21contributions in any amount from any source, provided that the 22committee files the document required by Section 9-3 of this 23Article and files the disclosure reports required by the 24provisions of this Article.25    (e-10) A limited activity committee shall not accept 26contributions, except that the officer or a candidate the   HB1765- 8 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1committee has designated to support may contribute personal 2funds in order to pay for maintenance expenses. A limited 3activity committee may only make expenditures that are: (i) 4necessary for maintenance of the committee; (ii) for rent or 5lease payments until the end of the lease in effect at the time 6the officer or candidate is confirmed by the Senate; (iii) 7contributions to 501(c)(3) charities; or (iv) returning 8contributions to original contributors. 9    (f) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a political 10committee from dividing the proceeds of joint fundraising 11efforts; provided that no political committee may receive more 12than the limit from any one contributor, and provided that an 13independent expenditure committee may not conduct joint 14fundraising efforts with a candidate political committee or a 15political party committee.16    (g) (Blank). On January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the 17State Board of Elections shall adjust the amounts of the 18contribution limitations established in this Section for 19inflation as determined by the Consumer Price Index for All 20Urban Consumers as issued by the United States Department of 21Labor and rounded to the nearest $100. The State Board shall 22publish this information on its official website.23    (h) Self-funding candidates. If a public official, a 24candidate, or the public official's or candidate's immediate 25family contributes or loans to the public official's or 26candidate's political committee or to other political   HB1765- 9 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1committees that transfer funds to the public official's or 2candidate's political committee or makes independent 3expenditures for the benefit of the public official's or 4candidate's campaign during the 12 months prior to an election 5in an aggregate amount of more than (i) $250,000 for statewide 6office or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective offices, then 7the public official or candidate shall file with the State 8Board of Elections, within one day, a Notification of 9Self-funding that shall detail each contribution or loan made 10by the public official, the candidate, or the public 11official's or candidate's immediate family. Within 2 business 12days after the filing of a Notification of Self-funding, the 13notification shall be posted on the Board's website and the 14Board shall give official notice of the filing to each 15candidate for the same office as the public official or 16candidate making the filing, including the public official or 17candidate filing the Notification of Self-funding. Notice 18shall be sent via first class mail to the candidate and the 19treasurer of the candidate's committee. Notice shall also be 20sent by e-mail to the candidate and the treasurer of the 21candidate's committee if the candidate and the treasurer, as 22applicable, have provided the Board with an e-mail address. 23Upon posting of the notice on the Board's website, all 24candidates for that office, including the public official or 25candidate who filed a Notification of Self-funding, shall be 26permitted to accept contributions in excess of any   HB1765- 10 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1contribution limits imposed by subsection (b). If a public 2official or candidate filed a Notification of Self-funding 3during an election cycle that includes a general primary 4election or consolidated primary election and that public 5official or candidate is nominated, all candidates for that 6office, including the nominee who filed the notification of 7self-funding, shall be permitted to accept contributions in 8excess of any contribution limit imposed by subsection (b) for 9the subsequent election cycle. For the purposes of this 10subsection, "immediate family" means the spouse, parent, or 11child of a public official or candidate.12    (h-5) If a natural person or independent expenditure 13committee makes independent expenditures in support of or in 14opposition to the campaign of a particular public official or 15candidate in an aggregate amount of more than (i) $250,000 for 16statewide office or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective 17offices in an election cycle, as reported in a written 18disclosure filed under subsection (a) of Section 9-8.6 or 19subsection (e-5) of Section 9-10, then the State Board of 20Elections shall, within 2 business days after the filing of 21the disclosure, post the disclosure on the Board's website and 22give official notice of the disclosure to each candidate for 23the same office as the public official or candidate for whose 24benefit or detriment the natural person or independent 25expenditure committee made independent expenditures. Upon 26posting of the notice on the Board's website, all candidates   HB1765- 11 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1for that office in that election, including the public 2official or candidate for whose benefit or detriment the 3natural person or independent expenditure committee made 4independent expenditures, shall be permitted to accept 5contributions in excess of any contribution limits imposed by 6subsection (b). 7    (h-10) If the State Board of Elections receives 8notification or determines that a natural person or persons, 9an independent expenditure committee or committees, or 10combination thereof has made independent expenditures in 11support of or in opposition to the campaign of a particular 12public official or candidate in an aggregate amount of more 13than (i) $250,000 for statewide office or (ii) $100,000 for 14all other elective offices in an election cycle, then the 15Board shall, within 2 business days after discovering the 16independent expenditures that, in the aggregate, exceed the 17threshold set forth in (i) and (ii) of this subsection, post 18notice of this fact on the Board's website and give official 19notice to each candidate for the same office as the public 20official or candidate for whose benefit or detriment the 21independent expenditures were made. Notice shall be sent via 22first class mail to the candidate and the treasurer of the 23candidate's committee. Notice shall also be sent by e-mail to 24the candidate and the treasurer of the candidate's committee 25if the candidate and the treasurer, as applicable, have 26provided the Board with an e-mail address. Upon posting of the   HB1765- 12 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1notice on the Board's website, all candidates of that office 2in that election, including the public official or candidate 3for whose benefit or detriment the independent expenditures 4were made, may accept contributions in excess of any 5contribution limits imposed by subsection (b). 6    (i) For the purposes of this Section, a corporation, labor 7organization, association, or a political action committee 8established by a corporation, labor organization, or 9association may act as a conduit in facilitating the delivery 10to a political action committee of contributions made through 11dues, levies, or similar assessments and the political action 12committee may report the contributions in the aggregate, 13provided that: (i) contributions made through dues, levies, or 14similar assessments paid by any natural person, corporation, 15labor organization, or association in a calendar year may not 16exceed the limits set forth in this Section; (ii) the 17corporation, labor organization, association, or a political 18action committee established by a corporation, labor 19organization, or association facilitating the delivery of 20contributions maintains a list of natural persons, 21corporations, labor organizations, and associations that paid 22the dues, levies, or similar assessments from which the 23contributions comprising the aggregate amount derive; and 24(iii) contributions made through dues, levies, or similar 25assessments paid by any natural person, corporation, labor 26organization, or association that exceed $1,000 in a quarterly   HB1765- 13 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1reporting period shall be itemized on the committee's 2quarterly report and may not be reported in the aggregate. A 3political action committee facilitating the delivery of 4contributions or receiving contributions shall disclose the 5amount of contributions made through dues delivered or 6received and the name of the corporation, labor organization, 7association, or political action committee delivering the 8contributions, if applicable. On January 1 of each 9odd-numbered year, the State Board of Elections shall adjust 10the amounts of the contribution limitations established in 11this subsection for inflation as determined by the Consumer 12Price Index for All Urban Consumers as issued by the United 13States Department of Labor and rounded to the nearest $100. 14The State Board shall publish this information on its official 15website.16    (j) A political committee that receives a contribution or 17transfer in violation of this Section shall dispose of the 18contribution or transfer by returning the contribution or 19transfer, or an amount equal to the contribution or transfer, 20to the contributor or transferor or donating the contribution 21or transfer, or an amount equal to the contribution or 22transfer, to a charity. A contribution or transfer received in 23violation of this Section that is not disposed of as provided 24in this subsection within 30 days after the Board sends 25notification to the political committee of the excess 26contribution by certified mail shall escheat to the General   HB1765- 14 -LRB104 07776 SPS 17821 b1Revenue Fund and the political committee shall be deemed in 2violation of this Section and subject to a civil penalty not to 3exceed 150% of the total amount of the contribution. 4    (k) For the purposes of this Section, "statewide office" 5means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, 6Secretary of State, Comptroller, and Treasurer. 7    (l) This Section is repealed if and when the United States 8Supreme Court invalidates contribution limits on committees 9formed to assist candidates, political parties, corporations, 10associations, or labor organizations established by or 11pursuant to federal law. 12(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22; 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 13102-909, eff. 5-27-22; 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.)